California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) Private hospitals shall be paid supplemental amounts for each subject fiscal quarter in a program period for the provision of hospital outpatient services as set forth in this section. The supplemental amounts shall be in addition to any other amounts payable to hospitals with respect to those services and shall not affect any other payments to hospitals. The supplemental amounts shall result in payments
 equal to the statewide aggregate upper payment limit for private hospitals for each subject fiscal year.

(b) Except as set forth in subdivisions (d) and (e), each private hospital shall be paid an amount for each subject fiscal year equal to the outpatient supplemental rate multiplied by the hospital’s outpatient base amount, which payments shall be made on a quarterly basis. The outpatient supplemental rate shall result in payments to hospitals that equal the applicable federal upper payment limit for the subject fiscal year, except that with respect to a subject fiscal year that begins before the start of a program period or that ends after the end of the program period for which the payments are made, the outpatient supplemental rate shall result in payments to hospitals that equal a percentage of the applicable upper payment limit where the percentage equals the percentage of the subject fiscal year that occurs during the program period.
 For purposes of this subdivision, the applicable federal upper payment limit shall be the federal upper payment limit for hospital outpatient services furnished by private hospitals for each subject fiscal year.

(c) In the event federal financial participation for a subject fiscal year is not available for all of the supplemental amounts payable to private hospitals under subdivision (b) due to the application of an upper payment limit or for any other reason, both of the following shall apply:

(1) The total amount payable to private hospitals under subdivision (b) for the subject fiscal year shall be reduced to the amount for which federal financial participation is available.

(2) The amount payable under subdivision (b) to each private hospital for the subject fiscal year shall be equal to the amount computed under
 subdivision (b) multiplied by the ratio of the total amount for which federal financial participation is available to the total amount computed under subdivision (b).

(d) Payments shall not be made under this section for the periods when a hospital is a new hospital during a program period.

(e) Payments shall be made to a converted hospital that converts during a subject fiscal quarter by multiplying the hospital’s outpatient supplemental payment as calculated in subdivision (b) by the number of days that the hospital was a private hospital in the subject fiscal quarter, divided by the number of days in the subject fiscal quarter. Payments shall not be made to a converted hospital in any subsequent subject fiscal quarter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.55.

(a) Private hospitals shall be paid supplemental amounts for the provision of hospital inpatient services for each subject fiscal quarter in a program period as set forth in this section. The supplemental amounts shall be in addition to any other amounts payable to hospitals with respect to those services and shall not affect any other payments to
 hospitals. The inpatient supplemental amounts shall result in payments to hospitals that equal the applicable federal upper payment limit for the subject fiscal year, except that with respect to a subject fiscal year that begins before the start of a program period or that ends after the end of the program period for which the payments are made, the inpatient supplemental amounts shall result in payments to hospitals that equal a percentage of the applicable upper payment limit where the percentage equals the percentage of the subject fiscal year that occurs during the program period.

(b) Except as set forth in subdivisions (e) and (f), each private hospital shall be paid the sum of the following amounts as applicable for the provision of hospital inpatient services for each subject fiscal quarter:

(1) A general acute care per diem supplemental rate multiplied by the hospital’s
 general acute care days.

(2) An acute psychiatric per diem supplemental rate multiplied by the hospital’s acute psychiatric days.

(3) A high acuity per diem supplemental rate multiplied by the number of the hospital’s high acuity days if the hospital’s Medicaid inpatient utilization rate is less than the percent required to be eligible to receive disproportionate share replacement funds for the state fiscal year ending in the base calendar year and greater than 5 percent and at least 5 percent of the hospital’s general acute care days are high acuity days.

(4) A high acuity trauma per diem supplemental rate multiplied by the number of the hospital’s high acuity days if the hospital qualifies to receive the amount set forth in paragraph (3) and has been designated as a Level I, Level II, Adult/Ped Level I, or
 Adult/Ped Level II trauma center by the Emergency Medical Services Authority established pursuant to Section 1797.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) A transplant per diem supplemental rate multiplied by the number of the hospital’s transplant days if the hospital’s Medicaid inpatient utilization rate is less than the percent required to be eligible to receive disproportionate share replacement funds for the state fiscal year ending in the base calendar year and greater than 5 percent.

(6) A payment for hospital inpatient services equal to the subacute supplemental rate multiplied by the Medi-Cal subacute payments as reflected in the state paid claims file prepared by the department as of the retrieval date for the base calendar year if the private hospital provided Medi-Cal subacute services during the base calendar year.

(c) In the event federal financial participation for a subject fiscal year is not available for all of the supplemental amounts payable to private hospitals under subdivision (b) due to the application of an upper payment limit or for any other reason, both of the following shall apply:

(1) The total amount payable to private hospitals under subdivision (b) for the subject fiscal year shall be reduced to reflect the amount for which federal financial participation is available.

(2) The amount payable under subdivision (b) to each private hospital for the subject fiscal year shall be equal to the amount computed under subdivision (b) multiplied by the ratio of the total amount for which federal financial participation is available to the total amount computed under subdivision (b).

(d) If the amount otherwise payable to a hospital under this section for a subject fiscal year exceeds the amount for which federal financial participation is available for that hospital, the amount due to the hospital for that subject fiscal year shall be reduced to the amount for which federal financial participation is available.

(e) Payments shall not be made under this section for the periods when a hospital is a new hospital during a program period.

(f) Payments shall be made to a converted hospital that converts during a subject fiscal quarter by multiplying the hospital’s supplemental payment as calculated in subdivision (b) by the number of days that the hospital was a private hospital in the subject fiscal quarter, divided by the number of days in the subject fiscal quarter. Payments shall not be made to a
 converted hospital in any subsequent subject fiscal quarter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 29.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.  This section was added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657 (SB 239).)
-------------------------------------------

14169.56.

(a) The department shall increase capitation payments to Medi-Cal managed health care plans for each subject fiscal year as set forth in this section.

(b) (1) Subject to the limitation in paragraph (2), the increased capitation payments shall be made as part of the
 monthly capitated payments made by the department to managed health care plans. The aggregate amount of increased capitation payments to all Medi-Cal managed health care plans for each subject fiscal year, or portion thereof, shall be the maximum amount for which federal financial participation is available on an aggregate statewide basis for the applicable subject fiscal year within a program period, or portion thereof.

(2) (A) The limitation in subparagraph (B) shall be applied with respect to a subject fiscal year or portion thereof for which the federal matching assistance percentage is less than 90 percent for expenditures for services furnished to individuals who meet the eligibility requirements in Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII)), and who meet the conditions described in Section 1905(y) of the federal Social Security Act (42
 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(y)).

(B) During a subject fiscal year or portion thereof described in subparagraph (A), the aggregate amount of the increased capitation payments under this section shall not exceed the aggregate amount of the increased capitation payments that would be made if the nonfederal share of the increased capitation payments were the amount that the nonfederal share would have been if the federal matching assistance percentage were 90 percent for expenditures for services furnished to individuals who meet the eligibility requirements in Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII)), and who meet the conditions described in Section 1905(y) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396d(y)).

(c) The department shall determine the amount of the increased capitation payments for each
 managed health care plan for each subject fiscal year or portion thereof during a program period. The department shall consider the composition of Medi-Cal enrollees in the plan, the anticipated utilization of hospital services by the plan’s Medi-Cal enrollees, and other factors that the department determines are reasonable and appropriate to ensure access to high-quality hospital services by the plan’s enrollees.

(d) The amount of increased capitation payments to each Medi-Cal managed health care plan shall not exceed an amount that results in capitation payments that are certified by the state’s actuary as meeting federal requirements, taking into account the requirement that all of the increased capitation payments under this section shall be paid by the Medi-Cal managed health care plans to hospitals for hospital services to Medi-Cal enrollees of the plan.

(e) (1) The increased capitation payments to managed health care plans under this section shall be made to support the availability of hospital services and ensure access to hospital services for Medi-Cal beneficiaries. The increased capitation payments to managed health care plans shall commence within 90 days after the date on which all necessary federal approvals have been received, and shall include, but not be limited to, the sum of the increased payments for all prior months for which payments are due.

(2) To secure the necessary funding for the payment or payments made pursuant to paragraph (1), the department may accumulate funds in the fund, for the purpose of funding managed health care capitation payments under this article regardless of the date on which capitation payments are scheduled to be paid in order to secure the necessary total funding for managed health care payments by the end of a program period.

(f) Payments to managed health care plans that would be paid consistent with actuarial certification and enrollment in the absence of the payments made pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, payments described in Section 14182.15, shall not be reduced as a consequence of payments under this section.

(g) (1) Each managed health care plan shall expend 100 percent of any increased capitation payments it receives under this section on hospital services as provided in Section 14169.57.

(2) The department may issue change orders to amend contracts with managed health care plans as needed to adjust monthly capitation payments in order to implement this section.

(3) For entities contracting with the department pursuant to
 Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089), any incremental increase in capitation rates pursuant to this section shall not be subject to negotiation and approval by the department.

(h) (1) In the event federal financial participation is not available for all of the increased capitation payments determined for a month pursuant to this section for any reason, the increased capitation payments mandated by this section for that month shall be reduced proportionately to the amount for which federal financial participation is available.

(2) The determination under this subdivision for any month in a program period shall be made after accounting for all federal financial participation necessary for full implementation of Section 14182.15 for that month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 30.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.  This section was added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657 (SB 239).)
-------------------------------------------

14169.57.

(a) Each managed health care plan receiving increased capitation payments under Section 14169.56 shall expend the capitation rate increases in a manner consistent with actuarial certification, enrollment, and utilization on hospital services. Each managed health care plan shall expend increased capitation payments on hospital services within 30 days of receiving the increased capitation payments to the extent
 they are made for a subject month that is prior to the date on which the payments are received by the managed health care plan.

(b) The sum of all expenditures made by a managed health care plan for hospital services pursuant to this section shall equal, or approximately equal, all increased capitation payments received by the managed health care plan, consistent with actuarial certification, enrollment, and utilization, from the department pursuant to Section 14169.56.

(c) Any delegation or attempted delegation by a managed health care plan of its obligation to expend the capitation rate increases under this section shall not relieve the plan from its obligation to expend those capitation rate increases. Managed health care plans shall submit the documentation that the department may require to demonstrate compliance with this subdivision. The documentation shall demonstrate
 actual expenditure of the capitation rate increases for hospital services, and not assignment to subcontractors of the managed health care plan’s obligation of the duty to expend the capitation rate increases.

(d) The supplemental hospital payments made by managed health care plans pursuant to this section shall reflect the overall purpose of this article.

(e) This article is not intended to create a private right of action by a hospital against a managed care plan provided that the managed health care plan expends all increased capitation payments for hospital services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657, Sec. 6.   (SB 239)   Effective October 8, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.58.

(a) (1) For the first program period, designated public hospitals shall be paid direct grants in support of health care expenditures, which shall not constitute Medi-Cal payments, and which shall be funded by the quality assurance fee set forth in this article. For the first program period, the aggregate amount of the grants to
 designated public hospitals funded by the quality assurance fee set forth in this article shall be forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) in the aggregate for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, ninety-three million dollars ($93,000,000) for the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, one hundred ten million five hundred thousand dollars ($110,500,000) for the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and sixty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($62,500,000) in the aggregate for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(2) (A) Of the direct grant amounts set forth in paragraph (1), the director shall allocate twenty-four million five hundred thousand dollars ($24,500,000) in the aggregate for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, fifty million five hundred thousand dollars ($50,500,000) for the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, sixty million five hundred
 thousand dollars ($60,500,000) for the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and thirty-four million five hundred thousand dollars ($34,500,000) in the aggregate for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year among the designated public hospitals pursuant to a methodology developed in consultation with the designated public hospitals.

(B) Of the direct grant amounts set forth in subparagraph (A), the director shall distribute six million one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($6,125,000) for each subject fiscal quarter in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, six million three hundred twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($6,312,500) for each subject fiscal quarter in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, seven million five hundred sixty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($7,562,500) for each subject fiscal quarter in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and eight million six hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($8,625,000) for each
 subject fiscal quarter in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year in accordance with the timeframes specified in subdivision (a) of Section 14169.66.

(C) Of the direct grant amounts set forth in subparagraph (A), the director shall distribute six million one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($6,125,000) for each subject fiscal quarter in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, six million three hundred twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($6,312,500) for each subject fiscal quarter in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, seven million five hundred sixty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($7,562,500) for each subject fiscal quarter in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and eight million six hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($8,625,000) for each subject fiscal quarter in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year only upon 100 percent of the rate range increases being distributed to managed health care plans pursuant to subparagraph (D) for the respective subject
 fiscal quarter. If the rate range increases pursuant to subparagraph (D) are distributed to managed health care plans, the direct grant amounts described in this subparagraph shall be distributed to designated public hospitals no later than 30 days after the rate range increases have been distributed to managed health care plans pursuant to subparagraph (D).

(D) Of the direct grant amounts set forth in paragraph (1), twenty million five hundred thousand dollars ($20,500,000) in the aggregate for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, forty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($42,500,000) for the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and twenty-eight million dollars ($28,000,000) in the aggregate for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year shall be withheld from payment to the designated public hospitals by the director,
 and shall be used as the nonfederal share for rate range increases, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14301.4, to risk-based payments to managed care health plans that contract with the department to serve counties where a designated public hospital is located. The rate range increases shall apply to managed care rates for beneficiaries other than newly eligible beneficiaries, as defined in subdivision (s) of Section 17612.2, and shall enable plans to compensate hospitals for Medi-Cal health services and to support the Medi-Cal program. Each managed health care plan shall expend 100 percent of the rate range increases on hospital services within 30 days of receiving the increased payments. Rate range increases funded under this subparagraph shall be allocated among plans pursuant to a methodology developed in consultation with the hospital community.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any amounts withheld
 from payment to the designated public hospitals by the director as the nonfederal share for rate range increases, including those described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2), shall not be considered hospital fee direct grants as defined under subdivision (k) of Section 17612.2 and shall not be included in the determination under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 17612.3.

(b) (1) For the first program period, nondesignated public hospitals shall be paid direct grants in support of health care expenditures, which shall not constitute Medi-Cal payments, and which shall be funded by the quality assurance fee set forth in this article. For the first program period, the aggregate amount of the grants funded by the quality assurance fee set forth in this article to nondesignated public hospitals shall be twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000) in the aggregate for two subject fiscal quarters in the
 2013–14 subject fiscal year, twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars ($17,500,000) in the aggregate for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(2) (A) Of the direct grant amounts set forth in paragraph (1), the director shall allocate two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in the aggregate for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, six million dollars ($6,000,000) for the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) in the aggregate for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year among the nondesignated public hospitals pursuant to a methodology
 developed in consultation with the nondesignated public hospitals.

(B) Of the direct grant amounts set forth in paragraph (1), ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in the aggregate for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, twenty-four million dollars ($24,000,000) for the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) in the aggregate for the two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year shall be withheld from payment to the nondesignated public hospitals by the director, and shall be used as the nonfederal share for rate range increases, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14301.4, to risk-based payments to managed care health plans that contract with the department. The rate range increases shall enable plans to compensate hospitals for Medi-Cal health services and to support the
 Medi-Cal program. Each managed health care plan shall expend 100 percent of the rate range increases on hospital services within 30 days of receiving the increased payments. Rate range increases funded under this subparagraph shall be allocated among plans pursuant to a methodology developed in consultation with the hospital community.

(c) If the amounts set forth in this section for rate range increases are not actually used for rate range increases as described in this section, the direct grant amounts set forth in this section that are withheld pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall be returned to the fund subject to paragraph (4) of subdivision (l) of Section 14169.52.

(d) For subsequent program periods, designated public hospitals and nondesignated public hospitals may be paid direct
 grants pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14169.59 upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 442, Sec. 31.   (SB 1465)   Effective September 18, 2014.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 14169.72.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date, pursuant to Section 14169.76.   Note: See Section 3.5 of Article XVI of the Constitution, which was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 52.  This section was added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 657 (SB 239).)
-------------------------------------------

14169.59.

(a) The department shall determine during each rebase calculation year the number of subject fiscal years in the next program period.

(b) During each rebase calculation year, the department shall retrieve the data, including, but not limited to, the days data source, used to determine
 the following for the subsequent program period: acute psychiatric days, annual fee-for-service days, annual managed care days, annual Medi-Cal days, fee-for-service days, general acute care days, high acuity days, managed care days, Medi-Cal days, Medi-Cal fee-for-service days, Medi-Cal managed care days, Medi-Cal managed care fee days, outpatient base amount, and transplant days. The department shall pull data from the most recent base calendar year for which the department determines reliable data is available for all hospitals.

(c) (1) During each rebase calculation year, the department shall determine all of the following supplemental payment rates for the subsequent program period, which supplemental payment rates shall be specified in provisional language in the annual Budget Act:

(A) The acute psychiatric per diem supplemental rate for each subject
 fiscal year during the program period.

(B) The general acute care per diem supplemental rate for each subject fiscal year during the program period.

(C) The high acuity per diem supplemental rate for each subject fiscal year during the program period.

(D) The high acuity trauma per diem supplemental rate for each subject fiscal year during the program period.

(E) The outpatient supplemental rate for each subject fiscal year during the program period.

(F) The subacute supplemental rate for each subject fiscal year during the program period.

(G) The transplant per diem supplemental rate for each subject fiscal year during the
 program period.

(2) During each rebase calculation year, the department shall determine all of the following fee rates for the subsequent program period, which fee rates shall be specified in provisional language in the annual Budget Act:

(A) The fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate for each subject fiscal year during the program period.

(B) The managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate for each subject fiscal year during the program period.

(C) The Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate for each subject fiscal year during the program period.

(D) The prepaid health plan hospital managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate for each subject fiscal year during
 the program period.

(E) The prepaid health plan hospital Medi-Cal managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate for each subject fiscal year during the program period.

(d) The department shall determine the rates set forth in subdivision (c) based on the data retrieved pursuant to subdivision (b). Each rate determined by the department shall be the same for all hospitals to which the rate applies. These rates shall be specified in provisional language in the annual Budget Act. The department shall determine the rates in accordance with all of the following:

(1) The rates shall meet the requirements of federal law and be established in a manner to obtain federal approval.

(2) The department shall consult with the hospital community in determining the
 rates.

(3) The supplemental payments and other Medi-Cal payments for hospital outpatient services furnished by private hospitals for each fiscal year shall equal as close as possible the applicable federal upper payment limit.

(4) The supplemental payments and other Medi-Cal payments for hospital inpatient services furnished by private hospitals for each fiscal year shall equal as close as possible the applicable federal upper payment limit.

(5) The increased capitation payments to managed health care plans shall result in the maximum payments to the plans permitted by federal law.

(6) The quality assurance fee proceeds shall be adequate to make the expenditures described in this article, but shall not be more than necessary to make the
 expenditures.

(7) The relative values of per diem supplemental payment rates to one another for the various categories of patient days shall be generally consistent with the relative values during the first program period under this article.

(8) The relative values of per diem fee rates to one another for the various categories of patient days shall be generally consistent with the relative values during the first program period under this article.

(9) The rates shall result in supplemental payments and quality assurance fees that are consistent with the purposes of this article.

(e) During each rebase calculation year, the director shall determine the amounts and allocation methodology, if any, of direct grants to designated public hospitals and
 nondesignated public hospitals for each subject fiscal year in a program period, in consultation with the hospital community. The amounts and allocation methodology may include a withholding of direct grants to be used as the nonfederal share for rate range increases. These amounts shall be specified in provisional language in the annual Budget Act.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision in this article, the following shall apply to the first program period under this article:

(A) The first program period under this article shall be the period from January 1, 2014, to December 31, 2016, inclusive.

(B) The acute psychiatric days shall be those identified in the Final Medi-Cal Utilization Statistics for the 2012–13 state fiscal year as calculated by the department as of December 17, 2012.

(C) The days data source shall be the hospital’s Annual Financial Disclosure Report filed with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development as of June 6, 2013, for its fiscal year ending during the 2010 calendar year.

(D) The general acute care days shall be those identified in the 2010 calendar year, as reflected in the state paid claims file on April 26, 2013.

(E) The high acuity days shall be those paid during the 2010 calendar year, as reflected in the state paid claims file prepared by the department on April 26, 2013.

(F) The Medi-Cal managed care days shall be those identified in the Final Medi-Cal Utilization Statistics for the 2012–13 fiscal year, as calculated by the department as of December 17, 2012.

(G) The outpatient base amount shall be those payments for outpatient services made to a hospital in the 2010 calendar year, as reflected in the state paid claims files prepared by the department on April 26, 2013.

(H) The transplant days shall be those identified in the 2010 Patient Discharge Data File Documentation from the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development accessed on June 28, 2011.

(I) With respect to a hospital described in subdivision (f) of Section 14165.50, both of the following shall apply:

(i) The hospital shall not be considered a new hospital as defined in Section 14169.51 for the purposes of this article.

(ii) To the extent permitted by federal law and other
 federal requirements, the department shall use the best available and reasonable current estimates or projections made with respect to the hospital for an annual period as the data, including, but not limited to, the days data source and data described as being derived from a state paid claims file, used for all purposes, including, but not limited to, the calculation of supplemental payments and the quality assurance fee. The estimates and projections shall be deemed to reflect paid claims and shall be used for each data element regardless of the time period otherwise applicable to the data element. The data elements include, but are not limited to, acute psychiatric days, annual fee-for-service days, annual managed care days, annual Medi-Cal days, fee-for-service days, general acute care days, high acuity days, managed care days, Medi-Cal days, Medi-Cal fee-for-service days, Medi-Cal managed care days, Medi-Cal managed care fee days, outpatient base amount, and transplant days.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision in this article, the following shall apply to determine the supplemental payment rates for the first program period:

(A) The acute psychiatric per diem supplemental rate shall be nine hundred sixty-five dollars ($965) for the two remaining subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, nine hundred seventy dollars ($970) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, nine hundred seventy-five dollars ($975) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year and nine hundred seventy-five dollars ($975) for the first two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(B) The general acute care per diem supplemental rate shall be eight hundred twenty-four dollars and forty cents ($824.40) for the two remaining subject
 fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, one thousand one hundred ten dollars and sixty-seven cents ($1,110.67) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, one thousand three hundred thirty-five dollars and forty-two cents ($1,335.42) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and one thousand four hundred forty-one dollars and twenty cents ($1,441.20) for the first two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(C) The high acuity per diem supplemental rate shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the two remaining subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first
 two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(D) The high acuity trauma per diem supplemental rate shall be two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the two remaining subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(E) The outpatient supplemental rate shall be 119 percent of the outpatient base amount for the two remaining subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, 268 percent of the outpatient base amount for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, 292 percent of
 the outpatient base amount for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and 151 percent of the outpatient base amount for the first two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(F) The subacute supplemental rate shall be 50 percent for the two remaining subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, 55 percent for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, 60 percent for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and 60 percent for the first two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year of the Medi-Cal subacute payments paid by the department to the hospital during the 2010 calendar year, as reflected in the state paid claims file prepared by the department on April 26, 2013.

(G) The transplant per diem supplemental rate shall be two thousand five hundred dollars
 ($2,500) for the two remaining subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for the first two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision in this article, the following shall apply to determine the fee rates for the first program period:

(A) The fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate shall be three hundred seventy-four dollars and ninety-one cents ($374.91) for the two remaining subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, four hundred twenty-five dollars and twenty-two cents ($425.22) for the subject fiscal quarters in
 the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, four hundred eighty dollars and eleven cents ($480.11) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and five hundred forty-two dollars and ten cents ($542.10) for the first two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(B) The managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate shall be one hundred forty-five dollars ($145) for the two remaining subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, one hundred forty-five dollars ($145) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, one hundred seventy dollars ($170) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and one hundred seventy dollars ($170) for the first two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.

(C) The Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate shall be four hundred fifty-seven
 dollars and ten cents ($457.10) for the two remaining subject fiscal quarters in the 2013–14 subject fiscal year, four hundred ninety-seven dollars and eight cents ($497.08) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2014–15 subject fiscal year, five hundred sixty-eight dollars and fifteen cents ($568.15) for the subject fiscal quarters in the 2015–16 subject fiscal year, and six hundred eighteen dollars and fourteen cents ($618.14) for the first two subject fiscal quarters in the 2016–17 subject fiscal year.
